Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 47.5
SAVINGS AND LOAN GUARANTY ACT

11-47.5-101 to 11-47.5-109. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article repealed, p. 666, § 7, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1987. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.